Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.497

Conversions incident to acquisition by savings bank holding company or merger or consolidation with savings bank holding company subsidiary—Application of RCW 32.32.110 and 32.32.115.

(1) In a conversion of an unconverted mutual savings bank that is in the process of acquisition by a savings bank holding company or in the process of merger or consolidation with a subsidiary of a savings bank holding company, the restrictions imposed by RCW 32.32.110 on resale of stock apply to shares of the holding company purchased on original issue by any director or officer of the converting savings bank that is in the process of acquisition, merger, or consolidation, and the restrictions imposed by this chapter apply to the ownership of capital stock in the holding company with the same force and effect as they would apply to the ownership of capital stock of the unconverted mutual savings bank if shares of this savings bank were offered to depositors or the public pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The tender of shares by directors and officers of a converted savings bank in exchange for shares of another converted savings bank, or for shares of a holding company, do not constitute a sale for purposes of RCW 32.32.110. However, the restrictions of RCW 32.32.110 and 32.32.115 apply to the resale of the shares they receive in such an exchange with the same force and effect as to the shares of the converted savings bank they purchased on original issue for a period of three years following the date of such purchase on original issue.

[ 1985 c 56 s 30.]